Hawaii statutes.
[§346-362] Duties. (a) The department
of human services shall administer and operate homeless facilities and any
other program for the homeless authorized by this part; establish programs for
the homeless; and take any other actions necessary to effectuate the purposes
of this part.

(b) The department shall adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 91 for the purposes of this part; provided that these rules, or any
rules relating directly to homelessness authorized by any statute, shall be
exempt from the public notice, public hearing, and gubernatorial approval
requirements of chapter 91 and shall take effect immediately upon filing with
the office of the lieutenant governor. [L 2010, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next